District of Columbia statutes.
Expired

2-327.03

Expiration.

Expired.

History

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1604
as added Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-267, § 4, 46 DCR 960

Cross References

Contracts, late payments and interest penalties, rules and regulations, see § 2-221.02.
Eastern market community advisory committee, see § 37-111.
Eastern market real property asset management, market manager, see § 37-105.
Licensure, non-health related occupations, boards, staffing and administration, see § 47-2853.10.
Mental health services, client enterprise program, establishment, see § 44-921.
Merit personnel system, classification and compensation, tax-favored and pre-tax benefits programs, see § 1-611.19.
Merit personnel system, health benefits, contracting for provision of health benefits, see § 1-621.04.
Merit personnel system, retirement, contracting for services, see § 1-626.06.
Substance abuse, prevention programs, financial assistance, see § 44-1205.
Tenant assistance program, contracts, participation applications and eligibility, see § 42-3503.03.
Washington metropolitan area transit authority, joint state oversight agency, procurement law inapplicable, see § 9-1109.06.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1183.23.

Editor's Notes

Temporary amendment of D.C. Law 12-175: Section 5 of D.C. Law 12-211 amended D.C. Law 12-175 by adding a new § 1604 codified as § 1-1183.23.

Section 9(b) of D.C. Law 12-211 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.